New York, session 2025-2026, A7888.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-d to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-d. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Major 4 Andrew D. Byers. All that portion of the state highway system constitut- 5 ing state route three hundred twenty-four beginning at its intersection 6 with Transit Road, continuing in a generally easterly direction, and 7 terminating at its intersection with Main Street in the town of 8 Clarence, county of Erie, shall be dedicated to Major Andrew D. Byers. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Major Andrew D Byers". Howev- 13 er, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, 14 the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be 15 one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not 16 be changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11511-04-5